Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 52
ORE BUYERS' LICENSES

34-52-101 to 34-52-107. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article repealed, p. 746, § 1, effective February 20.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 29 of chapter 92, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1976, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.